North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-09.2 Food Preparer Education

23-09.2-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the state department of health.

“Food preparer” means any person who manufactures, processes, sells, handles, or stores food and who is not required to obtain a license from the department under chapter 19-02.1, 23-09, or 23-09.1.

Any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in chapters 19-02.1, 23-09, and 23-09.1.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 316, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Note.

Section 1 of chapter 652, S.L. 1989, provides:

“

LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

Because facilities are not always available for the preparation of food onsite by nonprofit public-spirited organizations not regularly engaged in the business of selling food or to persons not regularly engaged in the business of preparing or selling food and who prepare food for sale directly to the ultimate consumer at a farmers’ market, bake sale, or similar enterprise, it is the intent of the legislative assembly to exempt organizations and persons in those situations from preparing food in licensed or approved kitchens. Because the unintentional mishandling of food may jeopardize the public health and welfare, whether the mishandling is done by an establishment open to public patronage or by a nonprofit public-spirited organization or a person providing a limited type of food service, it is the intent of the legislative assembly to authorize the department of health and consolidated laboratories to offer educational support to food preparers.”

23-09.2-01.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Food preparer” means any person who manufactures, processes, sells, handles, or stores food and who is not required to obtain a license from the department under chapter 19-02.1, 23-09, or 23-09.1.

Any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in chapters 19-02.1, 23-09, and 23-09.1.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 316, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 199, effective September 1, 2022.

23-09.2-02.
Rules.

The department may adopt rules regarding education of food preparers.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 316, § 2.

23-09.2-03.
Minor violations.

The department, local boards of health, and district health units shall attempt to resolve minor violations of this chapter through education. The department, local boards of health, and district health units are not required to report for prosecution minor violations of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 316, § 2.

23-09.2-04.
Exclusions.

This chapter does not apply to private homes where food is prepared or stored for individual family consumption and to the use of home-canned goods, nongrade A dairy products and food prepared using nongrade A dairy products, and to meat not inspected under the Federal Meat Inspection Act [34 Stat. 1260-1265; 21 U.S.C. 603 et seq.].

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 316, § 2.